Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-518
School activities pass; authorized; when.

The school board or board of education of any school district may authorize the issuance of a pass to any elected or appointed official, employee, retired employee, or volunteer of the district, member of a senior citizens group, or city official authorizing the admittance of the recipient of the pass and his or her spouse to recognized school activities without the need for the payment of any fee or charge. Such pass may be issued at no cost to the recipient or at such cost as may be designated by the board.

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,247;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 271.